Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6909
Health carrier, defined.

Health carrier means any entity that provides a health benefit plan including an insurance company, a fraternal benefit society, a health maintenance organization, and any other entity providing a plan of health insurance or health benefits subject to state insurance regulation.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 9.